Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Prohibited Acts — Penalties

54-7-201. Obstruction of roads, bridges and ditches — Penalty — Removal.

The chief administrative officer is authorized to remove or cause to be removed any fence, gate, or other obstruction from the roads, bridges and ditches of the county and to clean out and clear all fences and ditches along or adjacent to the county roads.

Any person who places or maintains an obstacle or obstruction upon the right-of-way of any county road and refuses to remove the obstacle or obstruction upon direction of the chief administrative officer to do so commits a Class C misdemeanor.

It is a Class C misdemeanor to place or cause to be placed any obstruction upon the right-of-way or in the ditches along any county road except that transmission lines, telephone or telegraph lines or poles may be placed on and along the right-of-way of any county road under the direction and with the permission of the chief administrative officer.

[Deleted by 2013 amendment.]

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, this section shall apply to all counties.

Acts 1974, ch. 738, § 13; T.C.A., § 54-1014; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2012, ch. 689, § 9; 2013, ch. 472, § 3.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (d) and (e).

The 2013 amendment deleted (d) which read: “Any person who injures or damages a bridge, highway, highway facility, highway structure or right-of-way shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor. Any such person shall also be liable in a civil action for the cost of such injury or damage.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 689, § 11. January 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 472, § 5. July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. County highway commission's duties, OAG 99-005 (1/25/99).

If the chief administrative officer determines that an object is an “obstruction,” the statute does not impose a duty on the chief administrative officer to remove that “obstruction,” OAG 00-072 (4/17/00).

Unless the owner cannot be located, notice by newspaper is insufficient to notify the owner of an object determined to be an obstruction of the chief administrative officer's decision to remove the object, OAG 00-072 (4/17/00).

T.C.A. § 54-7-201 does not impose a mandatory duty on a county's chief administrative officer to remove “obstructions,” but a county might be subject to liability under the Governmental Tort Liability Act if the county is aware of a potentially dangerous “obstruction,” OAG 00-072 (4/17/00).

If a county determines that an object within county right-of-way is an “obstruction,” the county may remove the “obstruction” without compensating the owner pursuant to the lawful exercise of its police power, OAG 00-072 (4/17/00).

54-7-202. Private use of equipment and materials prohibited — Penalty — Work for governmental entities authorized.

The chief administrative officer shall not authorize or knowingly permit the trucks or road equipment, the rock, crushed stone or any other road materials to be used for any private use or for the use of any individual for private purposes, and the chief administrative officer's failure to see that this subsection (a) is enforced is a Class C misdemeanor.

Any employee of the county road department who uses any truck or any other road equipment or any rock, crushed stone or other road material for that employee's personal use, or sells or gives those things away, shall be immediately discharged.

No truck or other road equipment or any rock, crushed stone or any road material shall be used to work private roads or for private purposes of owners of the roads.

Neither the chief administrative officer nor any other official or employee of the county may use any county vehicle, equipment, supplies or road materials for other than official county road purposes; however, the county governing body has the authority to authorize the county road department to perform work for other governmental entities; provided, that the cost of the projects so authorized is to be reimbursed to the county road department.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor. Each separate use of the same for other than authorized purposes constitutes a separate offense and is subject to a separate punishment.

Any person whose property is improved by having road material placed on the property in violation of this section shall be liable to suit for the value of the improvement. Any amounts recovered, including all legal fees and other recovery costs, shall go to the county road department.

Notwithstanding this section or any other section to the contrary, at the written request of the appropriate United States postal authority or the appropriate school board or education department, the county may use county vehicles, equipment and supplies to maintain areas for the purpose of providing public school buses and postal vehicles with a route and a turnaround area, even though the areas may not be on the official county road map or part of a public road right-of-way for which the county is responsible. The county shall not maintain the area if it will not be used for that purpose. The county shall obtain written permission from the owner of any property proposed to be used as a turnaround area prior to commencing any work on that property.

The county road department and the appropriate postal authority or school board or education department shall determine prior to commencement of the project whether all or part of the cost of the paving will be reimbursed to the road department.

[Deleted by 2012 amendment.]

Acts 1974, ch. 738, § 14; T.C.A., § 54-1015; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 89, § 1; 1999, ch. 286, § 1; 2012, ch. 689, § 10.

Attorney General Opinions.

T.C.A. § 54-7-202 does not necessarily prohibit a county from repairing or maintaining roads in such a county if the roads lead to a cemetery and are available for public.. It only prohibits the use of nonmonetary county resources for anything other than official county road purposes, subject to statutory exceptions. if a road qualifies as part of a dilapidated or abandoned cemetery, the county would be permitted to solicit, receive, and use funds to rehabilitate and maintain the cemetery, including any road that is a portion of the cemetery. However, T.C.A. § 46-2-107 does not abrogate T.C.A.. § 54-7-202’s prohibition on county officers and county employees from using any county vehicle, equipment, supplies, or road materials for non-official county road purposes. Accordingly, while a county may use those funds solicited and received for the purpose of rehabilitating a cemetery, it may not use its own nonmonetary resources, even if reimbursed with the funds received. Neither T.C. A. § 46-2-107 nor § 54-7-202 prohibits a county from contracting with a private contractor to repair and preserve these roads as long as the county has the authority to use its funds to repair and preserve the road in question. OAG 17-46, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (10/11/2017).

Compiler's Notes. This section was amended regarding the sale of crushed rock to churches and nonprofit cemeteries for the purpose of constructing or repairing roads in Rutherford County by Acts 1975, ch. 50, § 1.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted (g)(3) which read: “This subsection (g) shall not apply in any county with a population of four hundred thousand (400,000) or more, according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 689, § 11. January 1, 2013.

54-7-203. Personal financial interest prohibited — Penalties.

Neither the chief administrative officer, county highway commissioner, member of the county governing body nor any employee of the county road department shall be financially interested in or have any personal interest, either directly or indirectly, in the purchase of any supplies, machinery, materials, equipment or contractual services for the department or system of roads for the county, nor in any firm, corporation, partnership, association or individual selling or furnishing the machinery, equipment, supplies and materials.

A violation of this section constitutes official misconduct and is a Class C misdemeanor and is grounds for removal from office.

Acts 1974, ch. 738, § 15; T.C.A., § 54-1016; Acts 1980, ch. 682, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2012, ch. 640, § 3.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment substituted “materials, equipment or contractual services” for “materials, or equipment” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 640, § 4. March 30, 2012.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

54-7-204. Withholding of funds by state for violation.

If any provision of this chapter is violated in any county, the commissioner of transportation is authorized to withhold state-aid highway system funds due the county until the deficiency has been corrected to the satisfaction of the commissioner.

Acts 1974, ch. 738, § 16; T.C.A., § 54-1017; Acts 1983, ch. 320, § 5.

54-7-205. Removal of chief administrative officer.

“Chief administrative officer,” for the purpose of this section, includes county road commissioners, trustees, road supervisors, or other persons charged with supervision or control of a county road department.

In addition to any proceeding under title 8, chapter 47, the chief administrative officer of a county road department may be removed from office in accordance with this section.

The comptroller of the treasury shall forward a copy of audit reports covering county road departments to the district attorney general having jurisdiction and to the attorney general and reporter. If the audit indicates an apparent violation of any statute or regulation governing the operation of a county road department, including, but not limited to, an apparent violation of any statute or regulation applicable to accounting, budgeting or purchasing procedures, the audit report shall so state.

The district attorney general and the attorney general and reporter shall each review the audit reports and determine if there is sufficient cause for further investigation.

If the investigation indicates willful misfeasance, malfeasance or nonfeasance by the chief administrative officer of the road department, the district attorney general shall proceed, pursuant to title 8, chapter 47, to remove the chief administrative officer of the road department from office.

Any chief administrative officer removed from office on the basis of misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance under this section shall be ineligible to ever seek the office of chief administrative officer of a county road department in any county.

Acts 1980, ch. 553, § 1.

54-7-206. Theft or embezzlement by chief administrative officer.

Any theft by a chief administrative officer, either directly or indirectly, of county highway or road money shall be punished under § 39-14-105.

If any chief administrative officer charged with the collection, safekeeping, transfer, or disbursement of money or property belonging to the county highway department uses or diverts any part of the money or property by loan, investment, or otherwise, without authority of law, or converts any part of the money or property to the chief administrative officer's own use in any way whatsoever, the chief administrative officer commits embezzlement, and for every act, upon conviction, shall be punished as in the case of larceny, and in addition shall be required to pay to the court an amount equal to the amount embezzled. The amount shall be forwarded by the clerk to the county highway department.

Acts 1988, ch. 658, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor and felony provisions in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-113, 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “(a)(1) Any theft by a chief administrative officer, either directly or indirectly, of more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) of county highway or road money, is a felony, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not less than three (3) years nor more than twenty (20) years.“(2) Any theft by a chief administrative officer, either directly or indirectly, of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less of county highway or road money, is a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by confinement for not more than one (1) year.”; and substituted “any way whatsoever” for “any way whatever” in the middle of the first sentence of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. County road commission, agents, gratuitous work for nonprofit organizations, § 12-8-103.

Use of county equipment or material for private purposes, § 54-7-202.

54-7-207. Offense of damaging county highways structures.

As used in this subsection (a), “county highway structure” includes any county highway, highway facility, building, bridge, overpass, tunnel, barricade, fence, wall, traffic control device, right-of-way, sign or marker of any nature whatsoever erected upon or maintained within or adjacent to a county highway or the county highway right-of-way.

It is an offense for any person who is not authorized to construct or repair a county highway structure to knowingly carve upon, write, paint or otherwise mark upon, deface, rearrange, or alter any county highway structure.

It is an offense for any person who is not authorized to construct or repair a county highway structure to knowingly, in any manner, destroy, damage, knock down, mutilate, mar, steal or remove any county highway structure.

A violation of subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(3) is a Class A misdemeanor.

In addition to any criminal penalty provided by law for a violation of subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(3), there is created a separate civil cause of action for the cost of any damage resulting from such prohibited action.

There is created a civil cause of action for the cost of any damage done whenever a person negligently damages any county highway structure.

Criminal actions prosecuted pursuant to this subsection (a) shall be brought by the district attorney general of the judicial district in which the damage occurred. Civil actions instituted pursuant to this subsection (a) shall be brought by the county attorney or an attorney employed by the chief administrative officer of the county highway department.

Any person who reports information to a law enforcement officer that leads to the apprehension and conviction of a person for a violation of this section shall receive a reward of two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The county where the conviction occurs shall provide the reward money from the proceeds of the fines collected under this section.

The proceeds from the fines imposed for violations of this section shall be collected by the respective court clerks and then deposited in a dedicated county fund. The fund shall not revert to the county general fund at the end of a fiscal year but shall remain for the vandalism enforcement rewards established in subdivision (b)(1).

Each county shall expend the funds generated by the fines provided for in this section by appropriation for the vandalism enforcement rewards. Excess funds, if any, may be expended for litter control programs on adoption of an appropriate resolution by the county legislative body.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, this section shall apply to all counties.

Acts 2013, ch. 472, § 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 472, § 5. July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Vandalism, § 39-14-408.